District of Columbia statutes.
24-503

Restoration to sanity.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

When any person confined in a hospital for the mentally ill while serving sentence shall be restored to mental health within the opinion of the superintendent of the hospital, the superintendent shall certify such fact to the Director of the Department of Corrections of the District of Columbia and such certification shall be sufficient to deliver such person to such Director according to his request.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1340, ch. 854, § 929
Aug. 9, 1955, 69 Stat. 611, ch. 673, § 3
May 24, 2005, D.C. Law 15-358, § 202, 52 DCR 2015

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-303.
1973 Ed., § 24-303.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-358 repealed subsec. (a) which had read as follows: “(a) When any person confined in a hospital for the mentally ill, charged with crime and subject to be tried therefor, shall be found competent to stand trial in the opinion of the superintendent of such hospital, the superintendent shall certify such fact to the clerk of the court in which the indictment, information, or charge is pending, in accordance with the procedure specified in § 24-501, and deliver such person to the court according to its proper precept.”